Washington statutes.
RCW 2.16.070

Effect of chapter on existing laws.

Except for the provisions of *RCW 2.16.060, this chapter shall not be held to repeal any other existing law relating to the visitation of judges.

[ 1933 ex.s. c 58 s 7; RRS s 11051-7.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 2.16.060 was repealed by 1973 c 106 s 40.